dictsource/cmn_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded

// Default is to handle latin characters as pinyin
//// ?1:	speak latin characters as English words

.replace
//replace tone mark with tone number
// ˉ 1
// ˊ 2
// ˇ 3
// ˋ 4
// ā a1
// á a2
// ă a3
// ǎ a3
// à a4
// ō o1
// ó o2
// ŏ o3
// ǒ o3
// ò o4
// ê ea
// ē e1
// é e2
// ĕ e3
// ě e3
// è e4
// ī i1
// í i2
// ĭ i3
// ǐ i3
// ì i4
// ū u1
// ú u2
// ǔ u3
// ù u4
// ǖ ü1
// ǘ ü2
// ŭ u3
// ǚ ü3
// ǜ ü4
//some pinyin vaiants 
//ŋ ng
ɑ a
ɡ g 
ẑ zh 
ĉ ch 
ŝ sh 

.L01  j q x y

// Note:  ngK  matches "ng" if not followed by a vowel
// (D  will match on a digit and also if no digit is present. (special for tone
language).

// 儿 兒  erhua

.group a
//?1     a        _^_EN
       a        A
       ai	ai
//       a1i	ai55
//       a2i	ai35
//       a3i	ai214
//       a4i	ai51
       ao	Au
//       a1o	Au55
//       a2o	Au35
//       a3o	Au214
//       a4o	Au51

       a (DnK	a
   ch) a (DngK	A
   ch) a (4ngK	a
   ch) a (ng4K	a
    k) a (DngK	A
    _) a (DngK	A

    y) a	iA
    y) ao	Au
//    y) a1o	Au55
//    y) a2o	Au35
//    y) a3o	Au214
//    y) a4o	Au51
    y) a (DnK	iE
    y) a (DngK	iA

.group b
//?1     b        _^_EN
       b        p
    @) b (K	_^_EN

.group c
//?1     c        _^_EN
       c        tsh
       ch (+    ts.h
    @) c (K	_^_EN

.group d
//?1     d        _^_EN
       d        t
    @) d (K	_^_EN

.group e
//?1     e        _^_EN
       e	o-
    d) e	@
    t) e	@
    n) e	@
    l) e	@
    y) e	iE
       ea	E
       ei	ei
//       e1i	ei55
//       e2i	ei35
//       e3i	ei214
//       e4i	ei51

       e (Dn	@ //en eng

       er (K	@r
//       e1r (K	@r55
//       e2r (K	@r35
//       e3r (K	@r214
//       e4r (K	@r51

.group f
//?1     f        _^_EN
       f        f
    @) f (K	_^_EN

.group g
//?1     g        _^_EN
       g        k
    @) g (K	_^_EN

.group h
//?1     h        _^_EN
       h        x
    @) h (K	_^_EN

.group i
//?1     i        _^_EN
       i        i //i in ing
    z) i        i[
    c) i        i[
    s) i        i[
    h) i        i. //after zh ch sh
    r) i        i.
       ia	iA
       ia (DnK	iE
       ia (DngK	iA
       iao	jAu
//       ia1o	jAu55
//       ia2o	jAu35
//       ia3o	jAu214
//       ia4o	jAu51
       ie	iE
       io (DngK	y
    q) io (DngK	u 
       iu 	iou 

.group j
//?1     j        _^_EN
       j        tS;
    @) j (K	_^_EN

.group k
//?1     k        _^_EN
       k        kh
    @) k (K	_^_EN

.group l
//?1     l        _^_EN
       l        l
    @) l (K	_^_EN
    @) l (v     l

.group m
//?1     m        _^_EN
       m        m
    @) m (K	_^_EN

.group n
//?1     n        _^_EN
       n        n
       ng (K	N     // consider (ng+vowel) as (n g+vowel) ??
    _) ng (K	N-    // syllablic [N]

.group o
//?1     o        _^_EN
       o        o

       ou	ou
//       o1u	ou55
//       o2u	ou35
//       o3u	ou214
//       o4u	ou51

       ong (K   ong
//       o1ng (K	ong55
//       o2ng (K	ong35
//       o3ng (K	ong214
//       o4ng (K	ong51

    y) o	io 
    y) ou	iou
//    y) o1u	iou55
//    y) o2u	iou35
//    y) o3u	iou214
//    y) o4u	iou51

.group p
//?1     p        _^_EN
       p        ph
    @) p (K	_^_EN

.group q
//?1     q        _^_EN
       q        tS;h
    @) q (K	_^_EN

.group r
//?1     r        _^_EN
       r        z.
       r (K     @r11

.group s
//?1     s        _^_EN
       s        s
       sh (+    s.
    @) s (K	_^_EN

.group t
//?1     t        _^_EN
       t        th
    @) t (K	_^_EN

.group u
//?1     u        _^_EN
       u        u
       ua	wA
       ua (DnK	ua
    g) ua (DnK	wa
    k) ua (DnK	wa
       ua (DngK wA
       uai	uai
//       ua1i	uai55
//       ua2i	uai35
//       ua3i	uai214
//       ua4i	uai51
       ue	yE //üe
       ui	uei
   sh) ui	wei
       u (DnK	u@
    k) u (DnK   wu@
   _h) u (DnK	wu@
    t) u (DnK   wu@
       uo	uo

   sh) ui	rei
   sh) u (DnK	wo-
   sh) uo	wo

  L01) u	y   /// j,q,x,y + u
  L01) u (DnK	y@
    q) u (DnK+  yi
  L01) ua (DnK	y&
  L01) ue	yE


.group ü
//?1     ü	_^_EN
       ü	y
       üe	yE

.group v //variant of ü
//?1     v        _^_EN
       v	v // foreign words
    l) v        y //ü
    n) v        y //ü
    l) ve	yE //üe
    n) ve	yE //üe

.group w
//?1     w        _^_EN
    @) w (K	_^_EN
       wa	wA  //wa wan wang
       wai	wai
//       wa1i	wai55
//       wa2i	wai35
//       wa3i	wai214
//       wa4i	wai51
       wei	wei
//       we1i	wei55
//       we2i	wei35
//       we3i	wei214
//       we4i	wei51
       we	wu@ //wen weng
       wo	wo
       wu	wu

.group x
//?1     x        _^_EN
       x        S;
    @) x (K	_^_EN

.group y
//?1     y        _^_EN
       y	j //before a o e i
       y (u	//NULL before u
       y (uK	;
       y (uDn   ;
       yo (DngK	yu
       y (K     i    // foreign words
    @) y (K	_^_EN

.group z
//?1     z        _^_EN
       z        ts
       zh (+    ts.
    @) z (K	_^_EN


.group
       1      V
       2      X
       3      Y
       4      Z

//tone number
.group
	|	_|
